Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1155.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 17-333, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE17-333. License classifications; fees; reduced fee and complimentary licenses; annual report; review A. The commission shall prescribe by rule license classifications that are valid for the taking or handling of wildlife, fees for licenses, permits, tags and stamps and application fees. B. The commission may temporarily reduce or waive any fee prescribed by rule under this title on the recommendation of the director. C. The commission may reduce the fees for licenses and issue complimentary licenses, including the following: 1. A complimentary license to a pioneer who is at least seventy years of age and who has been a resident of this state for twenty-five or more consecutive years immediately before applying for the license.  The pioneer license is valid for the licensee's lifetime, and the commission may not require renewal of the license. 2. A complimentary license to a veteran of the armed forces of the United States who has been a resident of this state for one year or more immediately before applying for the license and who receives compensation from the United States government for a permanent service-connected disability rated as one hundred percent disabling. 3. A license for a reduced fee of up to twenty-five percent less than the full license fee to a veteran of the United States armed forces who has been a resident of this state for one year or more immediately before applying for the license and who receives compensation from the United States government for a service-connected disability. 4. 3. A license for a reduced fee that is one-half of the full license fee to a person who has been a resident of this state for one year or more immediately before applying for the license and who submits satisfactory proof to the department that the person is a veteran and a bona fide purple heart medal recipient. 5. 4. A youth license for a reduced fee to a resident of this state who is either: (a) A member of the boy scouts of America and who has attained the rank of eagle scout. (b) A member of the girl scouts of the USA and who has received the gold award. D. All monies collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, in the game and fish fund established by section 17-261. E. On or before December 31 of each year, the commission shall submit an annual report to the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, the chairperson of the senate natural resources, energy and water committee and the chairperson of the house of representatives energy, environment and natural resources committee, or their successor committees, that includes information relating to license classifications, fees for licenses, permits, tags and stamps and any other fees that the commission prescribes by rule. The joint legislative audit committee may assign a committee of reference to hold a public hearing and review the annual report submitted by the commission. END_STATUTE